Arkansas, session 2025, SB184.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the Arkansas Educational
Television Commission.
(a) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission is abolished, and
its authority, duties, functions, records, contracts, personnel, property,
and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations, and other funds,
including the functions of budgeting or purchasing are transferred to the
Department of Education.
(b) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission's statutory powers,
duties, and functions, including the functions of budgeting or purchasing,
records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances of
appropriations, allocations, and other funds are transferred to the
*LGL015*
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
Department of Education.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the Arkansas Educational Television
Commission does not affect the orders, rules, directives, registration,
licensing, or standards made or promulgated by the Arkansas Educational
Television Commission before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the Arkansas Educational Television Commission shall continue to
be in effect until they are amended or repealed by the Department of
Education.

SECTION 2. DO NOT CODIFY. Abolition of the State Library Board.
(a) The State Library Board is abolished, and its authority, duties,
functions, records, contracts, personnel, property, and unexpended balances
of appropriations, allocations, and other funds, including the functions of
budgeting or purchasing are transferred to the Department of Education.
(b) The State Library Board's statutory powers, duties, and functions,
including the functions of budgeting or purchasing, records, contracts,
personnel, property, and unexpended balances of appropriations, allocations,
and other funds are transferred to the Department of Education.
(c)(1) The abolishment of the State Library Board does not affect the
orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, or standards made or
promulgated by the State Library Board before the effective date of this act.
(2) The orders, rules, directives, registration, licensing, and
standards of the State Library Board shall continue to be in effect until
they are amended or repealed by the Department of Education.

SECTION 3. DO NOT CODIFY. The name of Arkansas Code Title 6, Chapter
3, is changed from "Arkansas Educational Television Commission" to "Arkansas
Educational Television". The Arkansas Code Revision Commission shall make all
changes in the Arkansas Code necessary to implement this section.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code §§ 6-3-101 – 6-3-103 are repealed.
6-3-101. Creation.
There is created the Arkansas Educational Television Commission.

6-3-102. Members.
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
(a)(1) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission shall consist of
eight (8) members, who shall be residents and qualified electors of the State
of Arkansas, with at least one (1) member being appointed from each of the
congressional districts of the state.
(2) At least one (1) member shall be a person who is actively
engaged in the field of education in the public school system of this state,
and one (1) member shall be a person actively engaged in education in an
institution of higher education in this state.
(3) No member of the commission shall hold any other office of
profit or trust under the United States, the State of Arkansas, or any
political subdivision thereof, or any office or employment paid in whole or
in part by any funds derived from tax sources, except persons actively
engaged in the field of education in the public schools or institutions of
higher education in this state.
(4) No member of the commission shall have any financial
interest in any facilities such as the commission is authorized to deal with,
including any interest in any commercial television or radio station.
(b)(1) Members of the commission shall be appointed by the Governor
with the advice and consent of the Senate for terms of eight (8) years.
(2) Members of the commission shall be eligible for
reappointment.
(3) If a vacancy occurs, the Governor shall, with the advice and
consent of the Senate, appoint another member of the commission for the
unexpired term.
(4) If the appointment of such member of the commission is
confirmed by the Senate, he or she shall serve the remainder of the unexpired
term.
(c) Each member may receive expense reimbursement and stipends in
accordance with § 25-16-901 et seq.

6-3-103. Organization — Rules.
(a) Promptly after their appointment, the members of the Arkansas
Educational Television Commission shall meet to organize.
(b) At the meeting they shall choose from their number a chair, a
secretary, and such other officers as they deem necessary.
(c) Thereafter officers shall be elected annually.
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
(d) The commission shall adopt rules regulating the conduct of its
meetings and the transaction of the business of the commission.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code §§ 6-3-104 – 6-3-109 are amended to read as
follows:
6-3-104. Agents and employees.
(a) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission may appoint such
agents and employees as it deems necessary or may delegate to one (1) or more
of its members, officers, agents, or employees such powers and duties as it
deems proper and is authorized to do by legislation.
(b)(1) The commission Department of Education is authorized to
contract with other educational institutions in this state for the employment
and use, on a contract basis, of the full-time or part-time services of
employees of those educational institutions and may pay for their services in
accordance with the provisions of such contracts.
(2)(b) In the event the commission department shall determine
that the use of full-time or part-time services of employees of such other
educational institutions in this state shall make it necessary that payment
therefor be from funds appropriated for the commission department for the
payment of regular salaries of employees of the commission department, upon
certification of the amount to the Chief Fiscal Officer of the State, the
amount shall be transferred from the appropriation made for regular salaries
of the commission department for the fiscal year involved to the
appropriation for maintenance and general operation of the commission
department for such fiscal year and may be expended for payments under
contracts as authorized herein.

6-3-105. Purpose — Powers and duties generally.
(a) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission is organized for
the purpose of making the benefits of educational television available to and
promoting its use by inhabitants of Arkansas.
(b) To this end, the Arkansas Educational Television Commission The
Department of Education is empowered and directed to survey, study, and
appraise the need for an overall plan for the use of television facilities
available for noncommercial educational use in the state.
(c)(b) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission department is
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
specifically charged with the duty of controlling and supervising the use of
channels reserved by the Federal Communications Commission to Arkansas for
noncommercial educational use.
(d)(1)(c)(1) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission department
may designate the location of stations to utilize such channels and make
rules governing the operation of these stations and the programs televised
over these channels.
(2) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission department
may own and operate television stations to utilize these channels, or it may
contract with individuals, corporations, educational institutions, or other
governmental agencies for the operation of such stations.

6-3-106. Execution of contracts.
The Arkansas Educational Television Commission Department of Education
is authorized to execute all contracts and other instruments necessary and
convenient to carry out the mandates of this chapter.

6-3-107. Acceptance of gifts or grants.
(a) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission Department of
Education may solicit and accept gifts or grants of money, real or personal
property, and voluntary and uncompensated services from any person, federal
or other governmental agency, board of education, educational institution, or
commercial or industrial enterprise.
(b) Any gifts and grants of money and any moneys derived from the sale
of real or personal property donated to the commission department may be
placed in a bank in this state and may be disbursed by the commission
department for the purposes for which the gifts, grants, or real or personal
property was donated or granted.

6-3-108. Equipment — Limits on commission department responsibility.
After receipt of any equipment furnished or installed by the Arkansas
Educational Television Commission Department of Education as part of the
implementation and administration of this chapter, the commission department
will not be responsible:
(1) For additional reception problems which may occur; or
(2) For replacement of any of the furnished equipment.
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184

6-3-109. Revolving cash fund.
(a) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission Department of
Education is authorized to establish in a bank authorized to do business in
this state, selected by the commission department, a revolving cash fund into
which the commission department shall pay all funds received from the sale of
instructional materials prepared by the commission department or purchased by
the commission department and sold to schools in this state in connection
with educational television programs.
(b) In addition, the commission department is authorized to expend
from the revolving cash fund amounts necessary to purchase instructional
materials for sale to schools to be used for educational television purposes,
including the cost of freight, postage, handling, and other delivery costs
incidental to the purchase or sale.
(c) The commission department shall keep a complete record of all
receipts and expenditures from the revolving cash fund and shall make the
record available to Arkansas Legislative Audit for audit and verification.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 6-3-110(a), concerning appropriations for
state employees, is repealed.
(a) No person employed by the Arkansas Educational Television
Commission and paid from state funds shall receive supplemental compensation
or remuneration from funds not appropriated by the state.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code §§ 6-3-112 and 6-3-113 are amended to read as
follows:
6-3-112. Authorization for lease of facilities.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission Department of
Education is authorized and empowered to arrange for the use of its
facilities as part of the implementation and administration of this chapter,
including without limitation tower space, studios, and equipment, by any
federal, state, or local governmental agency or by any other person, from
time to time, as any of such facilities are not needed by the commission
department, and to collect fees and charges, as the commission department
determines to be reasonable, in connection with the use of any such
facilities by any other person.
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
(2) Provided, however, agencies and educational institutions of
the State of Arkansas shall have preference for the use of commission
department facilities over other entities and persons and shall be assessed
fees and charges at preferential rates as determined by the commission
department.
(b) The commission department shall be exempt from complying with
general provisions of other laws dealing with public commodities and
facilities and their acquisition, leasing, or disposition in relation to the
use of its studios by other persons in such cases, as advertising for bids
would be impractical because of time limitations.
(c) Any revenue received by the commission department from the use of
its facilities by other persons under this section shall be cash funds
pursuant to § 6-3-109.
(d) The commission department is authorized to promulgate such rules
as it deems necessary for the implementation of this section.

6-3-113. Eminent domain power.
(a)(1) The Arkansas Educational Television Commission Department of
Education is hereby granted the right of eminent domain to condemn real
property leased or rented by the commission department if the property is
deemed to be necessary or desirable by the commission department for making
the benefits of educational television available to the citizens of Arkansas
or to otherwise carry out the purposes of this chapter, and if the commission
department is unable to agree with the owner of the land, or if, by legal
incapacity or absence of the owner, no agreement can be made for the
purchase.
(2) All suits for condemnation of real property under the
provisions of this section shall be brought by the commission department in
the name of the State of Arkansas.
(3) The real property may be acquired in fee simple or in any
lesser estate.
(b)(1) The commission department is authorized to make payment for
real property acquired under the provisions of this section out of any
appropriation made for the commission department.
(2) No land shall be taken or contracted to be taken for an
amount beyond the sum available therefor.
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
(c) The commission department shall exercise the power of eminent
domain in the manner provided for in § 27-67-311 et seq.
(d)(1) Actions by the commission department to condemn real property
shall be brought in the county in which the land is situated.
(2) If the land is located in more than one (1) county, the
action may be brought in any county in which the land is situated.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code Title 13, Chapter 2, Subchapter 1, is amended
to add an additional section to read as follows:
13-2-108. Implementation of library funds – Secretary of the
Department of Education.
The Secretary of the Department of Education or his or his designee
shall administer state and federal programs of aid to libraries and undertake
other activities and services as will further statewide development of
libraries and library systems through interlibrary, interagency, and
interstate cooperation in order to secure efficient and effective library
service for all Arkansans.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 13-2-204 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-204. State Librarian.
(a) The Arkansas State Library shall be headed by the State Librarian,
to be appointed by the State Library Board, in consultation with the
Secretary of the Department of Education. The State Librarian shall serve for
such time and for such terms as the board secretary may prescribe.
(b) The State Librarian shall be a person of good professional
standing and reputation, holding at least a master's degree from a graduate
school of library science accredited by the American Library Association, and
shall have had experience in library administration in academic, public,
school, or special libraries.
(c) The State Librarian shall have charge of the work of the library
and shall perform such other duties as the board secretary may prescribe.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code §§ 13-2-205 and 13-2-206 are repealed.
13-2-205. State Library Board.
(a) There is created the State Library Board.
(b)(1) The board shall consist of seven (7) members, to be appointed
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
by the Governor subject to confirmation by the Senate.
(2) The members of the board shall be appointed by the Governor
for reasons of their interest in libraries and in statewide library
development.
(3)(A) One (1) member of the board shall be appointed from each
of the four (4) congressional districts of this state in existence at the
time of appointment, and three (3) members shall be selected from the state
at large.
(B) However, no more than two (2) members of the board
shall be appointed from any one (1) congressional district.
(4)(A) All members appointed to the board shall serve terms of
seven (7) years and until their successors are appointed and qualified.
(B) No board member shall be appointed to serve for more
than two (2) consecutive full terms.
(c) Vacancies occurring on the board due to death, resignation, or
other reason shall be filled by appointment of the Governor for the remainder
of the unexpired portion of the term in the same manner as for the initial
appointment.
(d)(1) Members of the board shall receive per diem at the rate
established by law for attending board meetings or for performing other
services required of members in their official capacity as members of the
board.
(2) In addition, members shall be entitled to mileage at the
rate provided by law for official travel of state employees for each mile in
traveling from their place of residence to meetings of the board and
returning or for attending to other authorized business of the board.

13-2-206. Meetings of board.
(a) The State Library Board shall meet at such place or places and
shall keep such records as it may deem appropriate.
(b) The board shall select annually a chair and any other officers as
it deems necessary.
(c) The board shall adopt policies and bylaws governing its meetings,
the conduct of its business, and the business of the Arkansas State Library.
(d) The State Librarian shall serve as secretary of the board, but
without a vote thereon, and shall attend all of the board meetings and keep
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
records thereof.
(e) A majority of the board's members shall constitute a quorum for
the transaction of business, and all business transacted by the board shall
be by majority vote of its members.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code § 13-2-207(1), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas State Library, is amended to read as follows:
(1) Acquire books and other library materials by purchase,
exchange, gift, grant, or donation and catalog and maintain those books and
materials and make them available for reference and research use of the
public and the public officials and employees of this state and its political
subdivisions under such rules established by the State Library Board
Department of Education as may be reasonably necessary to govern the use and
preservation thereof;

SECTION 12. Arkansas Code § 13-2-207(10), concerning the powers and
duties of the Arkansas State Library, is repealed.
(10) Be the official state library agency designated to
administer state and federal programs of aid to libraries and to undertake
such other activities and services as will further statewide development of
libraries and library systems through interlibrary, interagency, and
interstate cooperation in order to secure efficient and effective library
service for all Arkansans;

SECTION 13. Arkansas Code § 13-2-208(a), concerning cooperation with
other libraries, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas State Library shall cooperate with the public and
private libraries in the State of Arkansas and may enter into necessary
agreements with libraries in other states and the Library of Congress for the
sharing of library books, documents, facilities, or services under such terms
and conditions as the State Library Board Department of Education shall
determine to be within the scope and services of the Arkansas State Library
and in keeping with the state's library programs.

SECTION 14. Arkansas Code § 13-2-209(a), concerning agreements between
the Arkansas State Library, the Arkansas State Archives, and the Secretary of
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
State, is amended to read as follows:
(a) The Arkansas State Library, acting through the State Library Board
Department of Education, is authorized to enter into necessary agreements
with the Arkansas State Archives, with respect to an overall plan and design
to assure that the functions and materials of the library and the Arkansas
State Archives may be convenient to the public and public officials of this
state and to its political subdivisions, and to assure that unnecessary
duplication of services and facilities is minimized.

SECTION 15. Arkansas Code § 13-2-509(c), concerning library trustees'
annual reports, is amended to read as follows:
(c) A copy of this report shall be filed with the State Library Board
Department of Education.

SECTION 16. Arkansas Code § 13-2-601 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-601. Definition.
As used in this compact, “state library agency”, with reference to this
state, means the State Library Board Department of Education.

SECTION 17. Arkansas Code § 13-2-605 is amended to read as follows:
13-2-605. Prerequisites for construction or maintenance of libraries.
No county, city, town, or combination thereof acting as a regional
library district of this state shall be party to a library agreement which
provides for the construction or maintenance of a library pursuant to Article
III, subdivision (c)7 of the compact, nor pledge its credit in support of
such a library, or contribute to the capital financing thereof, except:
(1) After after compliance with the Arkansas Constitution and
any laws applicable to the county, city, town, or combination thereof
relating to or governing capital outlays and the pledging of credit; and.
(2) After submitting the plan to the State Library Board for
approval.

SECTION 18. Arkansas Code § 19-5-304(3)(A), concerning the Educational
Television Fund Account of the Education Fund, is amended to read as follows:
(A) The Educational Television Fund Account shall be
used for the maintenance, operation, and improvement required by the
02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015

SB184
Educational Television Division of the Division of Elementary and Secondary
Education in carrying out those powers, functions, and duties of the Arkansas
Educational Television Commission Department of Education as set out in § 6-
3-101 et seq. or other duties imposed by law upon the Arkansas Educational
Television Commission.

SECTION 19. Arkansas Code § 25-11-203 is amended to read as follows:
25-11-203. Exemption.
No provision of this subchapter shall apply to any program or service
currently operated or administered by the Arkansas School for the Blind or
the State Library Board Department of Education, and this subchapter shall
not amend or repeal any statutory provision governing the operation of the
Arkansas School for the Blind or the Arkansas State Library.

SECTION 20. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(16), concerning stipends for
state boards, is repealed.
(16) Arkansas Educational Television Commission;

SECTION 21. Arkansas Code § 25-16-903(21), concerning stipends for
state boards, is repealed.
(21) State Library Board;

SECTION 22. Arkansas Code § 25-43-502(14), concerning state entities
transferred to the Department of Education, is repealed.
(14) The State Library Board, created under § 13-2-205;











02/03/2025 4:09:23 PM LGL015